Utah statutes.
79-5-202.   Council membership -- Expenses.

(1)  The council shall consist of 10 members knowledgeable about muscle-powered recreational activities as follows:

(a)  five members shall represent the public at large;

(b)  one member, nominated by the Utah League of Cities and Towns, shall represent city government;

(c)  one member, nominated by the Utah Association of Counties, shall represent county government;

(d)  one member shall represent the United States Forest Service;

(e)  one member shall represent the Bureau of Land Management; and

(f)  one member shall represent the National Park Service's River, Trails, and Conservation Assistance Program.

(2) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), as terms of current council members expire, the division shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the division shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of council members are staggered so that approximately half of the council is appointed every two years.

(3)  The council shall elect annually a chair and a vice chair from its members.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the division shall appoint the replacement for the unexpired term.

(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

